Hawaii statutes.
§510-3 Control of husband's separate
property. The husband has the same right to manage, control, dispose of,
and otherwise deal with his separate property as would be applicable with
respect to his property generally were it not for the enactment of this
chapter. [L 1945, c 273, pt of §1; RL 1955, §326-3; HRS §510-3]

Cross References

Spouse's separate property, see §572-25.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next